Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2830YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 609 Section 1. Section 675.3, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. âExercise of religionâ means the practice or observance 3 of religion. âExercise of religionâ includes but is not 4 limited to the ability to act or refuse to act in a manner 5 substantially motivated by oneâs sincerely held religious 6 belief, whether or not the exercise is compulsory or central 7 to a larger system of religious belief. âExercise of religionâ 8 includes the use of psychoactive substances, including but not 9 limited to psilocybin and peyote, in religious or spiritual 10 ceremonies. 11 Sec. 2. Section 675.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 1. State action shall not substantially burden a personâs 14 exercise of religion, even if the burden results from a rule 15 of general applicability , including but not limited to chapter 16 124 concerning controlled substances , unless the government 17 demonstrates that applying the burden to that personâs exercise 18 of religion is in furtherance of a compelling governmental 19 interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that 20 compelling governmental interest. 21